District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Youth Banking Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title 26 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding a new
section 26:9-112 is added to read as follows:
“§ 26:9-112. Minor deposit accounts.
“(a) For the purpose of this section only, the term “deposit account” means a checking or
savings account maintained with a bank or credit union lawfully doing business in the District.
“(b) A bank or credit union may open and maintain a deposit account for a minor who is
at least 14 years of age as the sole and absolute owner of the account.


“(c) A deposit account established under this section shall not require the consent of a
parent or legal guardian to open or operate.
“(d) A bank or credit union shall not provide overdraft credit, lines of credit, or other
credit features in connection with a deposit account established under this section without the
written consent of a parent or legal guardian.
“(e) A bank or credit union may not charge fees or overdraft charges on deposit accounts
established under this section, and such accounts shall be subject to consumer protection
standards promulgated by the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.”.
Sec. 3. Section 605 of the Credit Union Act of 2020, effective May 6, 2020 (D.C. Law
23-86; D.C. Official Code § 26-506.05), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Section 4 of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Establishment
Act of 1996, effective May 21, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-268; D.C. Official Code § 31–103), is
amended by adding a new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) The Department shall establish and maintain on its publicly accessible website a list
of banks and credit unions that offer deposit accounts for minors as described in D.C. Official
Code § 28:9-104A and post on the same webpage materials that educate minors about financial
fraud risks, including how to identify potential fraud on online shopping websites.”.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.


This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).